New Jersey, session 221, A2484.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 11 of P.L.1987, c.435 (C.22A:4-1a) is amended to read as follows: 11.  For services herein enumerated the State Treasurer shall collect the following fees: a.     For filing any original business certificate for which no other fee is fixed by statute or regulation, $125. For filing any change or amendment to a previously filed document for which no other fee is fixed by statute or regulation, $75. For issuing any certificate or filing any other document for which no other fee is fixed by statute or regulation, $25.00, except that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to: (1)   certificates of appointments for gubernatorial appointees; (2)   documents filed by public bodies under the "Senator Byron M. Baer Open Public Meetings Act," P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-6 et seq.); (3)   financial disclosures filed by State officials; (4)   oaths of office; (5)   resignation of office holders; (6)   documents filed by other State government entities indexed in the department's miscellaneous file. b.    For certification or exemplification of any document on file, $25.00. c.     For certification or exemplification of any signature on file, including the issuance of a certificate for proving a document outside the United States, also known as an apostille, $25.00; except that in cases of adoption of a child, the fee for an apostille shall be $5.00. d.    [For filing a certified copy of an order of change of name, $50.00.]Deleted by amendment P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.     For a paper copy of any document on file, up to $0.10 per letter size page or smaller and up to $0.15 per legal size page or larger.  If a roll of microfilm images is requested, the State Treasurer shall collect a fee of $1.00 for each image on the microfilm roll.  If a microfiche copy of a microfiche is requested, $3.00. f.     For filing a proof of publication, $10.00. (cf: P.L.2010, c.75, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, a $50 fee is charged for filing a certified copy of an order for change of name.  Many New Jersey residents seek a change of name each year for reasons including marriage and divorce. This bill eliminates the fee for filing a certified copy of a name change order in this State.